Hawaii statutes.
[§121-44] Youth challenge program.
(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department may receive,
expend, use, manage, and invest money, services, or property, real, personal,
or mixed, that may be given, bequeathed, devised, or in any other manner
provided, from sources other than the legislature or the federal government,
for any purpose authorized under the Hawaii national guard youth challenge
program, as described in that certain grant program under the National Guard
Bureau, and not inconsistent with any terms or conditions imposed by the donor,
this section, or chapter 84.

(b) A gift of money shall be deposited by the
director of finance in a separate account in the state treasury and expended in
accordance with law and any terms and conditions that may pertain to the gift.
Unless otherwise specified as a term or condition, the department may convert a
gift of property into money. Income derived from property or the conversion of
property may be used for the purposes described in this section and to pay for
the storage, handling, management, repair, maintenance, and distribution of
other properties held by the department for these purposes.

(c) All expenditures made pursuant to this
section shall be subject to the approval of the adjutant general.

(d) In the case of services and property,
real, personal, or mixed received, the department shall thereafter be
responsible for their management, repair, and maintenance.

(e) The source making the gift shall not be
liable upon any claim for injury arising from the donated property; provided
that this provision shall not affect the responsibility or liability of
manufacturers of defective products nor shall it affect the responsibilities of
negligent persons who cause dangerous conditions that result in injury.

(f) The department shall maintain records of
each gift, the essential facts of gift management, details relating to
expenditures of all money made pursuant to this section, and the current
disposition, use, and condition of each gift held by the department. This
information shall be compiled and reported annually to the legislature and the
governor, and shall be made available to the general public free of charge. [L
1995, c 233, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next